Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
CHAPTER 41 Department of the Treasury
41.305.
Elder and vulnerable victims trust fund.

The elder and vulnerable victims trust fund is created as a separate revolving fund in the Office of the State Treasurer.

The moneys in the trust fund shall be expended only as provided in this section and are hereby appropriated for those purposes.

The State Treasurer shall credit to the trust fund all amounts received for this purpose, including appropriations, grants, gifts, and any amounts received under KRS

381.280

.

The State Treasurer shall invest trust fund money in the same manner as surplus funds are invested. Earnings shall be credited to the trust fund.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys remaining in the trust fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section.

Money shall be disbursed from the trust fund only for the purpose of providing funding to one (1) or more public or private nonprofit organizations, including government organizations, in the development or operation of elder or vulnerable adult abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation prevention or intervention programs. An organization shall be eligible to receive funding only if:

The organization agrees to provide at least a twenty-five percent (25%) match of the total project amount requested, which may consist of monetary or in-kind contributions;

The organization demonstrates a willingness and ability to provide program models and consultation to other organizations and communities regarding program development and maintenance; and

The organization funds:

Programs which provide advocacy, crisis counseling, financial guardianship, or other similar services to victims of elder or vulnerable adult abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation;

Law enforcement, prosecution, or court-based programs that enhance case investigations, prosecutions, or victim assistance in criminal cases involving elder or vulnerable adult abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation;

Programs which develop and implement public education and awareness campaigns on elder and vulnerable adult abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation by making use of electronic and print media to inform the public about the nature of these crimes and available resources such as victims’ rights, legal remedies, agency services, and prevention strategies; or

Research initiatives that provide greater insight into the dynamics of elder and vulnerable adult abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation and guidance on best practices for intervention or prevention strategies.

Fiscal, programmatic, and disbursement authority over trust fund money shall be provided by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, which shall develop a review panel system to award grants from the trust fund on an annual basis. Panel members shall be individuals with knowledge and operational experience in elder and vulnerable adult abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation and shall be drawn from the law enforcement, court, prosecution, and victim advocacy communities.

In disbursing money from the trust fund, the panel shall not disburse to any one (1) program more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the total funds available for disbursement and shall seek to distribute meaningful awards to as many programs as possible throughout the Commonwealth.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 43, § 4, effective June 8, 2011.

41.310.
Treasurer to furnish information regarding receipts and expenditures to the Finance and Administration Cabinet on a monthly basis.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall furnish the Treasurer with information regarding the status of each receipt and expenditure account. At the end of each month, the Treasurer shall furnish the Finance and Administration Cabinet with information regarding the accumulated receipts and a listing of all warrants unpaid as of the end of the last day of each month.

History.

159, 4699: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 119, § 11; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1998, ch. 118, § 12, effective July 15, 1998.

41.320.
Governor may require statement of condition of Treasury.

The Governor may require, at any time, a full statement of the condition of the Treasury from the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Treasurer, and the state depositories. The Treasurer shall, at all times when called upon by the Governor, exhibit his or her books and accounts of the Treasury and all cash on hand or on deposit.

History.

4690, 4699: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 2021 ch. 155, § 17, effective June 29, 2021.

41.330.
Delivery of office to successor — Certification of accounts and inventory — Certification by assistant treasurer in case of vacancy due to death or incapacitation of Treasurer.

Upon the expiration of the term of office of the Treasurer, or if a vacancy occurs, the outgoing Treasurer shall certify in writing that the accounts and inventory of the Treasury, as recorded in the recordkeeping systems of the Commonwealth, are true, complete, and accurate as of the close of business on the Treasurer’s last day in office. The certification shall include accounts and tangible property held by the Treasury pursuant to KRS Chapters 393 and 393A. A copy of this certification shall be provided to the following:

The Auditor of Public Accounts;

The Secretary of State; and

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The money, books, supplies, and equipment shall be delivered to the newly elected Treasurer or the person who fills the vacancy, and the newly elected Treasurer or the person who fills the vacancy shall give a receipt for them which shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

In the event that a vacancy occurs due to the death or incapacitation of the Treasurer, the certification set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall be completed by the assistant in accordance with KRS

41.060

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the right of the Auditor to review the accounts and inventory of the Treasurer at other times as the Auditor may deem necessary or appropriate, or as required by KRS

43.060

.

History.

4684, 4700; 2021 ch. 155, § 18, effective June 29, 2021.

41.340.
Annual report by Treasurer. [Repealed]

History.

4698: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 57, effective July 1, 1983; repealed by 2021 ch. 155, § 24, effective June 29, 2021.

41.345.
Photostatic copies of Treasury records — Use as evidence.

Treasury checks and records that are susceptible to photostatic reproduction may be proved as to foundation, identity, and authenticity without any preliminary testimony, by use of legible and durable copies, certified in the manner provided herein by the State Treasurer as custodian of the originals. The copies may be used in any trial, hearing, deposition, or any other judicial or administrative action or proceeding, whether civil or criminal, in lieu of the original checks or records.

When a subpoena duces tecum is served upon the State Treasurer requiring the production of any checks or records at any action or proceeding, it is sufficient if the State Treasurer, as custodian of the original thereof, promptly notifies, in writing, the attorney for the party causing service of the subpoena, of the State Treasurer’s election to proceed under the provisions of this section. Upon notification, the attorney causing the service of the subpoena shall notify all other attorneys of record, or other parties if they are not represented by attorneys, of the State Treasurer’s procedure. Following notification, the State Treasurer as custodian of the checks or records specified in the subpoena shall promptly deliver, by certified mail, legible and durable copies, certified by the State Treasurer, of checks or records specified in the subpoena. The certification shall be signed before a notary public by the State Treasurer as custodian of the records.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 372, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 211, § 2, effective March 30, 1990.

41.350.
Canceled checks and electronic transactions records to be kept ten years.

Canceled checks and records of all electronic transactions of the State Treasurer debiting state depositories shall be preserved by the State Treasurer for a period of ten (10) years.

For purposes of this subsection, preservation of records may be in an electronic format, including the records contained within the state’s unified and integrated system of accounts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 4; 1982, ch. 252, § 2, effective January 1, 1983; 1982, ch. 382, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 211, § 1, effective March 30, 1990; 1998, ch. 118, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 155, § 19, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since the checks of the State Treasurer upon state depository banks must be preserved for seven years warrants held by the State Treasurer must, by implication, be preserved for a similar period; thus prior to the elapsing of the seven-year period the State Treasurer may microfilm the warrants held in her office provided such is accomplished in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Library and Archives (now Department for Libraries and Archives) and the original record, when it is microfilmed, may be destroyed subject to the rules and regulations of the subject department; however, since checks issued by the state treasurer must be presented within one year under KRS

41.370

, the microfilming of the original warrants should not take place until at least after the elapsing of one year from the date of issue of the check relating to the warrant in question plus an additional period sufficient to cover cancellation and reissue process described in KRS

41.370

.

OAG 76-404

.

41.360.
Disposition of unclaimed balances of payroll deductions for war bond purchases.

Where any officer or employee of the state government or of any agency of the state government has authorized the State Treasurer to deduct from his compensation as such officer or employee a sum or sums for the purchase of United States Series E savings bonds, and thereafter, for any cause, has departed from such office or employment leaving unclaimed in the hands of the State Treasurer a sum arising from such deduction not equal to the amount for which such a bond may be purchased, the State Treasurer shall, within ninety (90) days after the date of the last deduction, mail to such officer or employee, at his last-known address as shown on the records of the Personnel Cabinet, a notice stating the sum held by the State Treasurer for such officer or employee, and requesting that he make claim for the same within six (6) months thereafter. A duplicate of such notice, addressed to the officer or employee, shall at the same time be delivered to the state agency of which the person was an officer or employee. If, at the expiration of six (6) months from the date of mailing the letter, the officer or employee has not made claim for the sum due him, the sum shall, as of July 1 following the expiration of such six-months’ period, be presumed abandoned.

On or before September 1 of each year, the State Treasurer shall report to the Department of Revenue, in duplicate, a list of the sums presumed to be abandoned as of the preceding July 1, giving the name of the officer or employee and his last-known address. The State Treasurer shall cause the report to be posted and published as provided in KRS

393A.030

. If, by November 15 following such posting and publication, the sums involved have not been claimed, the State Treasurer shall place the sums to the credit of the general fund in the State Treasury and shall report that fact to the Department of Revenue. Thereafter such sums shall have the same status as other property turned over to the Department of Revenue, and the rights of any person to make claim for the same shall rest upon the same principles as the rights of other claimants of property presumed to be abandoned under the provisions of KRS Chapter 393.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 3; 1998, ch. 154, § 61, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 47, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 163, § 87, effective July 14, 2018.

41.370.
Check to be presented within one year — Cancellation and warrant against check.

Any check issued by the State Treasurer shall not be valid as an order for payment after one (1) year from its date of issue and this limitation shall appear on all checks issued. The State Treasurer is authorized to clear the records of all such unpaid checks and credit the amounts to the fund against which it was originally drawn.

When any properly endorsed check issued by the State Treasurer is presented for payment more than one (1) year after its date of issue and within the period prescribed by KRS

413.120

, the State Treasurer shall, upon satisfactory proof of ownership, cancel the check and forward it to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet with the date and identifying information which credited the amount of the check to a particular fund. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall draw a warrant against the check. All endorsements on the surrendered check shall have the same effect as if the check were paid by the drawee. All checks paid in the manner herein set forth shall be charged against the fund against which they were originally drawn.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 187; 1972, ch. 209, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2); 1988, ch. 74, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 115, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 118, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2012, ch. 88, § 3, effective April 11, 2012.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Provisions in this section for payment of a stale check can be applied anytime, provided that there is sufficient money in the fund against which the surrendered check was originally drawn, but if there is an insufficiency in the proper fund or where the check is over five years old, the Legislature would have to pass a specific bill to authorize its payment.

OAG 76-221

.

41.375.
Issuance of duplicate check — Liability for loss sustained by issuance.

A duplicate check shall be issued by the Treasurer upon:

Receipt of a notarized affidavit, which may be transmitted to the Treasury in an electronic format, signed by the payee and stating that the original check has been lost or stolen; and

A review of the records of the Treasury, including the unified and integrated system of accounts to determine that the original check has not been presented for payment.

The payee receiving a duplicate check shall make good any loss the Commonwealth or the Treasurer may sustain on account of the issuance of the duplicate or the presentation and payment of the original, if the loss has been caused by actions of the payee. The Treasurer shall not be liable for any loss sustained by the issuance of the duplicate check.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 115, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2021 ch. 155, § 20, effective June 29, 2021.

41.380.
Investment commission — Power to invest surplus funds — Disposition of interest. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

41.390.
Power to borrow money and issue negotiable notes. [Repealed.]

41.400.
Child victims’ trust fund — Limitation on disbursement.

The child victims’ trust fund is created as a separate fund in the office of the State Treasurer. The fund shall be expended only as provided in this section.

The State Treasurer shall credit to the trust fund all amounts received for this purpose and any amounts received under KRS

141.440

.

The State Treasurer shall invest trust fund money in the same manner as surplus funds are invested. Earnings shall be credited to the trust fund.

Until the total amount of assets in the trust fund exceeds twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), not more than one-half of the money contributed to the trust fund each year, plus the earnings credited to the trust fund during the previous fiscal year, and the money earned by the sale of child victims’ trust fund license plates pursuant to KRS Chapter 186, shall be available for disbursement upon the authorization of the state board as provided in KRS

15.935

. After such time that the State Treasurer certifies that the assets in the trust fund exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), only the earnings credited to the trust fund shall be available for disbursement upon the authorization of the state board as provided in KRS

15.935

.

Funds granted or funds received as gifts or donations to the child victims’ trust fund shall be available for disbursement upon appropriation by the General Assembly, and funds authorized for expenditure shall not be considered assets for purposes of subsection (4) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 13, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 366, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 133, § 9, effective June 20, 2005.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Armstrong & Gillig, Responding to Child Sexual Abuse and Exploitation: The Kentucky Approach, 16 N. Ky. L. Rev. 17 (1988).

41.410.
Commonwealth Council on Developmental Disabilities — Members — Executive director — Duties.

The Commonwealth Council on Developmental Disabilities is created within the Department of the Treasury.

The Commonwealth Council on Developmental Disabilities is established to comply with the requirements of the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 and any subsequent amendment to that act.

The members of the Commonwealth Council on Developmental Disabilities shall be appointed by the Governor to serve as advocates for persons with developmental disabilities. The council shall be composed of twenty-six (26) members.

Ten (10) members shall be representatives of: the principal state agencies administering funds provided under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 as amended; the state agency that administers funds provided under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA); the state agency that administers funds provided under the Older Americans Act of 1965 as amended; the single state agency designated by the Governor for administration of Title XIX of the Social Security Act for persons with developmental disabilities; higher education training facilities, each university-affiliated program or satellite center in the Commonwealth; and the protection and advocacy system established under Public Law 101-496. These members shall represent the following:

Office of Vocational Rehabilitation;

Division of Blind Services within the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation;

Department of Education;

Department for Aging and Independent Living;

Department for Medicaid Services;

Department of Public Advocacy, Protection and Advocacy Division;

University-affiliated programs;

Local and nongovernmental agencies and private nonprofit groups concerned with services for persons with developmental disabilities;

Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities; and

Department for Public Health, Division of Maternal and Child Health.

At least sixty percent (60%) of the members of the council shall be composed of persons with developmental disabilities or the parents or guardians of persons, or immediate relatives or guardians of persons with mentally impairing developmental disabilities, who are not managing employees or persons with ownership or controlling interest in any other entity that receives funds or provides services under the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000 as amended and who are not employees of a state agency that receives funds or provides services under this section. Of these members, five (5) members shall be persons with developmental disabilities, and five (5) members shall be parents or guardians of children with developmental disabilities or immediate relatives or guardians of adults with mentally impairing developmental disabilities who cannot advocate for themselves. Six (6) members shall be a combination of individuals in these two (2) groups, and at least one (1) of these members shall be an immediate relative or guardian of an institutionalized or previously institutionalized person with a developmental disability or an individual with a developmental disability who resides in an institution or who previously resided in an institution.

Members not representing principal state agencies shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. Members shall serve no more than two (2) consecutive three (3) year terms. Members shall serve until their successors are appointed or until they are removed for cause.

The council shall elect its own chair, adopt bylaws, and operate in accordance with its bylaws. Members of the council who are not state employees shall be reimbursed for necessary and actual expenses. The Department of the Treasury shall provide personnel adequate to ensure that the council has the capacity to fulfill its responsibilities. The council shall be headed by an executive director. If the executive director position becomes vacant, the council shall be responsible for the recruitment and hiring of a new executive director.

The Commonwealth Council on Developmental Disabilities shall:

Develop and implement the state plan as required by Part B of the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, as amended, with a goal of development of a coordinated consumer and family centered focus and direction, including the specification of priority services required by that plan;

Monitor, review, and evaluate, not less often than annually, the implementation and effectiveness of the state plan in meeting the plan’s objectives;

To the maximum extent feasible, review and comment on all state plans that relate to persons with developmental disabilities;

Submit to the Department of the Treasury and the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services any periodic reports on its activities as required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and keep records and afford access as the Department of the Treasury finds necessary to verify the reports;

Serve as an advocate for individuals with developmental disabilities and conduct programs, projects, and activities that promote systematic change and capacity building;

Examine, not less than once every five (5) years, the provision of and need for federal and state priority areas to address, on a statewide and comprehensive basis, urgent needs for services, supports, and other assistance for individuals with developmental disabilities and their families; and

Prepare, approve, and implement a budget that includes amounts paid to the state under the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, as amended, to fund all programs, projects, and activities under that Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 20, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 156, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 138, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 118, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 24, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 146, § 22, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 17, effective July 12, 2012; Repealed and reenact., 2018, ch. 95 § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 125, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 146, § 4, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 26, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

41.415.
STABLE Kentucky accounts — Administration — Cooperative agreements.

As used in this section, “STABLE Kentucky account” has the same definition as set forth in KRS

164A.260

.

The Department of the Treasury shall be responsible for administering and promoting STABLE Kentucky accounts.

In order to ensure that the program is administered in a cost-effective manner, the Department of the Treasury may enter into any cooperative agreements, contracts, or similar instruments with:

Other states which administer programs created under 26

U.S.C. sec. 529

A;

Other agencies or departments of the Commonwealth; or

A nonprofit organization tasked with providing services to individuals who are eligible for a STABLE Kentucky account.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 125, § 2, effective June 27, 2018.